apertium-guj.guj.dix
    <!-- SECTION: Verbs -->
	<pardef n="હો/વું__vbser">
		<e><p><l>છું</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>છીએ</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>છે</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>છો</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>છે</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>છે</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

<!-- gender doesnt matter in simple present and future
		<e><p><l>છું</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>છીએ</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>છે</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>છો</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>છે</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>છે</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>હોઈશ</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>હોઈશું</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>હશે</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>હશો</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>હશે</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>હશે</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
-->
		<e><p><l>હોઈશ</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>હોઈશું</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>હશે</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>હશો</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>હશે</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>હશે</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

		<!-- the 2 genders are differentiated only in past tense-->
		<e><p><l>હતો</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>હતા</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>હતો</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>હતા</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>હતો</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>હતા</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>હતી</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>હતી</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>હતી</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>હતી</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>હતી</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>હતી</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>હતું</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>હતાં</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>હતું</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>હતાં</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>હતું</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>હતાં</l><r>હો<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>


	<pardef n="હસ/વું__iv_vblex">
		<e><p><l>વું</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

	<!--simple present-->
		<e><p><l>ું</l><r><s n="iv"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ીએ</l><r><s n="iv"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>ે</l><r><s n="iv"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!--FIXME: non-honorific : tu-->
		<e><p><l>ો</l><r><s n="iv"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!--FIXME: honorific : tame -->

		<e><p><l>ે</l><r><s n="iv"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ે</l><r><s n="iv"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>ું</l><r><s n="iv"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ીએ</l><r><s n="iv"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>ે</l><r><s n="iv"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!--FIXME: non-honorific : tu-->
		<e><p><l>ો</l><r><s n="iv"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!--FIXME: honorific : tame -->

		<e><p><l>ે</l><r><s n="iv"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ે</l><r><s n="iv"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

	<!--simple future-->
		<e><p><l>ીશ</l><r><s n="iv"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ીશું</l><r><s n="iv"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>શે</l><r><s n="iv"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!--FIXME: non-honorific : tu-->
		<e><p><l>શો</l><r><s n="iv"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!--FIXME: honorific : tame -->

		<e><p><l>શે</l><r><s n="iv"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>શે</l><r><s n="iv"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>ું</l><r><s n="iv"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ીએ</l><r><s n="iv"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>ે</l><r><s n="iv"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!--FIXME: non-honorific : tu-->
		<e><p><l>ો</l><r><s n="iv"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!--FIXME: honorific : tame -->

		<e><p><l>ે</l><r><s n="iv"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ે</l><r><s n="iv"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

    <e lm="હો"><i></i><par n="હો/વું__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="હસવું"><i>હસ</i><par n="હસ/વું__iv_vblex"/></e>
